Utah statutes.
31A-14-211.   Restrictions on foreign title insurers.
(1)  An authorized foreign title insurer may not insure property in this state
except:
(a)  through a title insurance producer who is a resident in Utah;
(b)  through a bona fide branch office in Utah under the direction and control
of the title insurer that pays all the expenses of the branch office including
compensation of all employees; or
(c)  through a subsidiary title insurer authorized to do business in Utah.
(2)  This section does not apply to reinsurance.
